Mississippi, session 2026, HB1501.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Notwithstanding any provision of law or regulation to the contrary, a fire apparatus operated by a municipality, county, or fire protection district that has reached the maximum service life of twenty (20) years may be granted a one-time service life extension not to exceed five (5) additional years, provided the apparatus meets all requirements established under this act. SECTION 2.  To qualify for the service life extension, the fire apparatus must: (a)  Successfully pass a comprehensive mechanical, safety, and operational inspection conducted by a certified fire apparatus inspector or other qualified authority approved by the State Fire Marshal; (b)  Meet or exceed minimum safety standards established by the State Fire Marshal, which may include braking systems, pump performance, structural integrity, emergency lighting, and essential operational components; (c)  Be certified as safe for continued service for each year of the extension period; and (d)  Not have previously received a service life extension under this act. SECTION 3.  The State Fire Marshal, in consultation with the Mississippi Insurance Department and relevant fire service organizations, shall promulgate rules and guidelines necessary to implement this act, including inspection criteria, certification procedures, documentation requirements, and annual review standards. SECTION 4. Nothing in this act shall be construed to require a municipality or fire protection district to extend the service life of any fire apparatus.  The decision to seek an extension shall remain at the discretion of the governing authority. SECTION 5.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.